Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.540

Objections by nonparents.

A court may not restrict the right of a parent to relocate the child when the sole objection to the relocation is from a third party, unless that third party is entitled to residential time or visitation under a court order and has served as the primary residential care provider to the child for a substantial period of time during the thirty-six consecutive months preceding the intended relocation.

[ 2000 c 21 s 16.]

NOTES:

Intent—Captions not law—2000 c 21: See notes following RCW 26.09.405.